Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.150

Criminal profiteering lien—Conveyance of property by trustee, liability.

(1) If a trustee conveys title to real property for which, at the time of the conveyance, the trustee has been personally served with notice as provided in RCW 9A.82.130(1) of a lien under this chapter, the trustee shall be liable to the state for the greater of:

(a) The amount of proceeds received by the person named in the lien notice as a result of the conveyance;

(b) The amount of proceeds received by the trustee as a result of the conveyance and distributed by the trustee to the person named in the lien notice; or

(c) The fair market value of the interest of the person named in the lien notice in the real property so conveyed.

(2) If the trustee conveys the real property for which a lien notice has been served on the trustee at the time of the conveyance and holds the proceeds that would otherwise be paid or distributed to the beneficiary or at the direction of the beneficiary or beneficiary's designee, the trustee's liability shall not exceed the amount of the proceeds so held so long as the trustee continues to hold the proceeds.

[ 2001 c 222 s 19. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 16; 1984 c 270 s 15.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.